Missouri, session 2026, HB2944.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 137.1050, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 137.1050, to read as follows:
137.1050. 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible credit amount", the difference between an eligible taxpayer's real
property tax liability on such taxpayer's homestead for a given tax year, minus the real
property tax liability on such homestead in the eligible taxpayer's initial credit year;
(2) "Eligible taxpayer", a Missouri resident who:
(a) Is sixty-two years of age or older;
(b) Is an owner of record of a homestead or has a legal or equitable interest in such
property as evidenced by a written instrument; and
(c) Is liable for the payment of real property taxes on such homestead;
(3) "Homestead", real property actually occupied by an eligible taxpayer as the
primary residence. An eligible taxpayer shall not claim more than one primary residence;
(4) "Initial credit year":
(a) In the case of a taxpayer that meets all requirements of subdivision (2) of this
subsection prior to the year in which a credit is authorized pursuant to subsection 2 of this
section, the year in which such credit is authorized;
(b) For all other taxpayers, the year in which the taxpayer meets all requirements of
subdivision (2) of this subsection.

EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2944 2
If in any tax year subsequent to the eligible taxpayer's initial credit year the eligible taxpayer's
real property tax liability is lower than such liability in the initial credit year, such tax year
shall be considered the eligible taxpayer's initial credit year for all subsequent tax years. This
provision shall not apply if an eligible taxpayer's real property tax liability is lower than such
liability in the taxpayer's initial credit year solely due to a reduction in a property tax levy
made pursuant to section 321.554.
2. (1) Any county authorized to impose a property tax may grant a property tax credit
to eligible taxpayers residing in such county in an amount equal to the taxpayer's eligible
credit amount, provided that:
(a) Such county adopts an ordinance authorizing such credit; or
(b) a. A petition in support of a referendum on such a credit is signed by at least five
percent of the registered voters of such county voting in the last gubernatorial election and the
petition is delivered to the governing body of the county, which shall subsequently hold a
referendum on such credit.
b. The ballot of submission for the question submitted to the voters pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the County of ______ exempt senior citizens aged 62 and
older from increases in the property tax liability due on such
senior citizens' primary residence?
YES NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the credit shall be in effect.
(2) An ordinance adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall not preclude such ordinance from being amended or superseded by a petition
subsequently adopted pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. (1) A county granting credit pursuant to this section shall apply such credit when
calculating the eligible taxpayer's property tax liability for the tax year. The amount of the
credit shall be noted on the statement of tax due sent to the eligible taxpayer by the county
collector. The county governing body may adopt reasonable procedures in order to carry out
the purposes and intent of this section, provided that the county shall not adopt any procedure
that limits the definition or scope of eligible credit amount or eligible taxpayer as defined in
this section.
(2) If an eligible taxpayer makes new construction and improvements to such eligible
taxpayer's homestead, the real property tax liability for the taxpayer's initial credit year shall
be increased to reflect the real property tax liability attributable to such new construction and
improvements.

HCS HB 2944 3
(3) If an eligible taxpayer's homestead is annexed into a taxing jurisdiction to which
such eligible taxpayer did not owe real property tax in the eligible taxpayer's initial credit
year, then the real property tax liability for the taxpayer's initial credit year shall be increased
to reflect the real property tax liability owed to the annexing taxing jurisdiction.
4. For the purposes of calculating property tax levies pursuant to section 137.073, the
total amount of credits authorized by a county pursuant to this section shall be considered tax
revenue, as such term is defined in section 137.073, actually received.
5. A county granting a tax credit pursuant to this section shall notify each political
subdivision within such county of the total credit amount applicable to such political
subdivision by no later than November thirtieth of each year.
6. For all tax years beginning on or after the effective date of this section, an
eligible taxpayer applying for the tax credit authorized under the provisions of this
section shall not be required to reapply annually. Upon initial qualification under the
provisions of this section and any additional provisions adopted by the county governing
body, the eligible taxpayer shall maintain such eligibility without a requirement to
reapply for qualification each year. The tax credit shall continue to be automatically
applied to the eligible taxpayer's homestead until the tax year in which the eligible
taxpayer relocates to another homestead or upon the death of the eligible taxpayer,
which shall be certified with a copy of the death certificate or notification of the
relocation within ninety days of the date of either such event. If a credit is granted in
error due to the failure of the taxpayer to notify the county collector of relocation or
death, the governing body of the county may remedy the error.
7. The department of health and senior services shall, subject to appropriation
by the general assembly, establish and maintain a secure electronic portal accessible to
each county, through a county designee authorized to administer or assist in
administering any senior citizen property tax credit program authorized under this
section for the limited purpose of verifying whether an applicant is deceased. Such
portal shall permit authorized county designees to access or query records necessary to
determine the death status of applicants in order to ensure the accurate and lawful
administration of such tax credit.
8. In the event no appropriation is made for the establishment or maintenance of
such portal, the department of health and senior services shall, no later than July
thirtieth of each year, provide to each county, through its authorized county designee, a
report listing all individuals whose deaths were recorded within that county during the
period beginning July first of the immediately preceding year and ending June thirtieth
of the current year. Such report shall be provided in a format reasonably usable by the

HCS HB 2944 4
county designee for purposes of administering, verifying, and maintaining eligibility for
the senior citizen property tax credit.
9. Each county designee, in furtherance of administering any senior citizen
property tax credit eliminating the need for mandatory annual renewal by eligible
applicants, shall implement reasonable procedures to determine whether a change of
ownership has occurred with respect to any homestead receiving such credit prior to the
issuance of property tax statements for the applicable tax year. Such procedures shall
conform to applicable local ordinances, administrative processes, and available records,
100 and shall ensure the accurate continuation or removal of such credit based upon
101 eligibility.
102 10. Any payment of real or personal property taxes transmitted through the
103 United States Postal Service and postmarked no later than January fifth of the year
104 immediately following the applicable tax year shall be deemed timely paid and shall not
105 be subject to penalty or interest, provided that, regardless of postmark date, any check,
106 cashier's check, or money order dated later than December thirty-first of the applicable
107 tax year shall be considered delinquent, and further provided that any payment made
108 by means other than United States Postal Service mail, including but not limited to in-
109 person, electronic, internet, interactive voice response, or electronic check payments
110 shall be considered delinquent if received after December thirty-first of the applicable
111 tax year.
112 11. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in any county
113 operating under a township form of government, the township collector, or other county
114 designee authorized to collect property taxes, shall have the same authority as provided
115 to county collectors under section 139.053 to accept partial or installment payments of
116 real and personal property taxes prior to delinquency. Such township collector or
117 county designee may establish reasonable procedures for the acceptance, processing,
118 safeguarding, and accounting of such installment payments consistent with state law
119 and local ordinances, and taxpayers within such jurisdictions shall have the same rights
120 and opportunities to remit property taxes through installment payments as taxpayers in
121 counties without a township form of government.
122 12. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in the event a county
123 experiences technical, administrative, or operational difficulties that materially delay
124 the preparation, printing, or mailing of real or personal property tax statements, the
125 county governing body may extend the deadline for timely payment of such taxes for a
126 period not to exceed thirty days beyond the otherwise applicable delinquency date.
127 During such extension period, payments received shall be deemed timely and shall not
128 be subject to penalty or interest. The county governing body shall provide reasonable

HCS HB 2944 5
129 public notice of such extension, and such extension shall apply uniformly to all affected
130 taxpayers within the jurisdiction.
131 13. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the county assessor,
132 township assessor, or other county designee responsible for the administration of
133 assessment lists, personal property declarations, homestead verification forms, or other
134 assessment-related filings may allow a grace period not to exceed ten days following the
135 statutory deadline for submission of such forms when such forms are transmitted
136 through the United States Postal Service and postmarked on or before the applicable
137 due date but received after such due date due to postal delay. Any such form received
138 within the authorized grace period shall be deemed timely filed and shall not result in
139 penalty, estimated assessment, or disqualification from any property tax credit or relief
140 program solely due to delayed receipt. The assessor or county designee may establish
141 reasonable procedures to verify postmark dates and ensure uniform and consistent
142 application of such grace period in accordance with state law.
✔